Illinois, session 104th, HB5407.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 5by changing Sections 825-65 and 845-45 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3501/825-65)7    Sec. 825-65. Clean Coal, Coal, Energy Efficiency, PACE, 8and Renewable Energy Project Financing. 9    (a) Findings and declaration of policy.10        (i) It is hereby found and declared that Illinois has 11    abundant coal resources and, in some areas of Illinois, 12    the demand for power exceeds the generating capacity. 13    Incentives to encourage the construction of coal-fueled 14    electric generating plants in Illinois to ensure power 15    generating capacity into the future and to advance clean 16    coal technology and the use of Illinois coal are in the 17    best interests of all of the citizens of Illinois.18        (ii) It is further found and declared that Illinois 19    has abundant potential and resources to develop renewable 20    energy resource projects and that there are many 21    opportunities to invest in cost-effective energy 22    efficiency projects throughout the State. The development 23    of those projects will create jobs and investment as well   HB5407- 2 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1    as decrease environmental impacts and promote energy 2    independence in Illinois. Accordingly, the development of 3    those projects is in the best interests of all of the 4    citizens of Illinois.5        (iii) The Authority is authorized to issue bonds to 6    help finance Clean Coal, Coal, Energy Efficiency, PACE, 7    and Renewable Energy projects pursuant to this Section.8    (b) Definitions.9        (i) "Clean Coal Project" means (A) "clean coal 10    facility", as defined in Section 1-10 of the Illinois 11    Power Agency Act; (B) "clean coal SNG facility", as 12    defined in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; 13    (C) transmission lines and associated equipment that 14    transfer electricity from points of supply to points of 15    delivery for projects described in this subsection (b); 16    (D) pipelines or other methods to transfer carbon dioxide 17    from the point of production to the point of storage or 18    sequestration for projects described in this subsection 19    (b); or (E) projects to provide carbon abatement 20    technology for existing generating facilities. 21        (ii) "Coal Project" means new electric generating 22    facilities or new gasification facilities, as defined in 23    Section 605-332 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 24    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 25    Illinois, which may include mine-mouth power plants, 26    projects that employ the use of clean coal technology,   HB5407- 3 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1    projects to provide scrubber technology for existing 2    energy generating plants, or projects to provide electric 3    transmission facilities or new gasification facilities.4        (iii) "Energy Efficiency Project" means measures that 5    reduce the amount of electricity or natural gas required 6    to achieve a given end use, consistent with Section 1-10 7    of the Illinois Power Agency Act. "Energy Efficiency 8    Project" also includes measures that reduce the total Btus 9    of electricity and natural gas needed to meet the end use 10    or uses consistent with Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 11    Agency Act.12        (iv) "Renewable Energy Project" means (A) a project 13    that uses renewable energy resources, as defined in 14    Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; (B) a 15    project that uses environmentally preferable technologies 16    and practices that result in improvements to the 17    production of renewable fuels, including but not limited 18    to, cellulosic conversion, water and energy conservation, 19    fractionation, alternative feedstocks, or reduced 20    greenhouse gas emissions; (C) transmission lines and 21    associated equipment that transfer electricity from points 22    of supply to points of delivery for projects described in 23    this subsection (b); or (D) projects that use technology 24    for the storage of renewable energy, including, without 25    limitation, the use of battery or electrochemical storage 26    technology for mobile or stationary applications.   HB5407- 4 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1    (c) Creation of reserve funds. The Authority may establish 2and maintain one or more reserve funds to enhance bonds issued 3by the Authority for a Clean Coal Project, a Coal Project, an 4Energy Efficiency Project, a PACE Project, or a Renewable 5Energy Project. There may be one or more accounts in these 6reserve funds in which there may be deposited:7        (1) any proceeds of the bonds issued by the Authority 8    required to be deposited therein by the terms of any 9    contract between the Authority and its bondholders or any 10    resolution of the Authority;11        (2) any other moneys or funds of the Authority that it 12    may determine to deposit therein from any other source; 13    and14        (3) any other moneys or funds made available to the 15    Authority. Subject to the terms of any pledge to the 16    owners of any bonds, moneys in any reserve fund may be held 17    and applied to the payment of principal, premium, if any, 18    and interest of such bonds.19    (d) Powers and duties. The Authority has the power:20        (1) To issue bonds in one or more series pursuant to 21    one or more resolutions of the Authority for any Clean 22    Coal Project, Coal Project, Energy Efficiency Project, 23    PACE Project, or Renewable Energy Project authorized under 24    this Section, within the authorization set forth in 25    subsection (e).26        (2) To provide for the funding of any reserves or   HB5407- 5 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1    other funds or accounts deemed necessary by the Authority 2    in connection with any bonds issued by the Authority.3        (3) To pledge any funds of the Authority or funds made 4    available to the Authority that may be applied to such 5    purpose as security for any bonds or any guarantees, 6    letters of credit, insurance contracts or similar credit 7    support or liquidity instruments securing the bonds.8        (4) To enter into agreements or contracts with third 9    parties, whether public or private, including, without 10    limitation, the United States of America, the State or any 11    department or agency thereof, to obtain any 12    appropriations, grants, loans or guarantees that are 13    deemed necessary or desirable by the Authority. Any such 14    guarantee, agreement or contract may contain terms and 15    provisions necessary or desirable in connection with the 16    program, subject to the requirements established by the 17    Act.18        (4.5) To make loans under subsection (i) of Section 19    801-40 to finance loans for PACE Projects. 20        (5) To exercise such other powers as are necessary or 21    incidental to the foregoing.22    (e) Clean Coal Project, Coal Project, Energy Efficiency 23Project, PACE Project, and Renewable Energy Project bond 24authorization and financing limits. In addition to any other 25bonds authorized to be issued under Sections 801-40(w), 26825-60, 830-25 and 845-5, the Authority may have outstanding,   HB5407- 6 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1at any time, bonds for the purpose enumerated in this Section 2825-65 in an aggregate principal amount that shall not exceed 3$3,000,000,000, subject to the following limitations: (i) up 4to $300,000,000 may be outstanding issued to finance projects, 5as described in clause (C) of subsection (b)(i) and clause (C) 6of subsection (b)(iv) of this Section 825-65; (ii) up to 7$500,000,000 may be outstanding issued to finance projects, as 8described in clauses (D) and (E) of subsection (b)(i) of this 9Section 825-65; (iii) up to $2,000,000,000 may be outstanding 10issued to finance Clean Coal Projects, as described in clauses 11(A) and (B) of subsection (b)(i) of this Section 825-65 and 12Coal Projects, as described in subsection (b)(ii) of this 13Section 825-65; and (iv) up to $2,000,000,000 may be 14outstanding issued to finance Energy Efficiency Projects, as 15described in subsection (b)(iii) of this Section 825-65, 16Renewable Energy Projects, as described in clauses (A), (B), 17and (D) of subsection (b)(iv) of this Section 825-65, and PACE 18Projects. The limitations on aggregate principal amounts 19outstanding set forth in this subsection shall exclude bonds 20issued to refund the bonds of the Authority or bonds of the 21predecessor authorities issued under this Section 825-65. An 22application for a loan financed from bond proceeds from a 23borrower or its affiliates for a Clean Coal Project, a Coal 24Project, Energy Efficiency Project, PACE Project, or a 25Renewable Energy Project may not be approved by the Authority 26for an amount in excess of $450,000,000 for any borrower or its   HB5407- 7 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1affiliates. A Clean Coal Project, Coal Project, or PACE 2Project must be located within the State. An Energy Efficiency 3Project may be located within the State or outside the State, 4provided that, if the Energy Efficiency Project is located 5outside of the State, it must be owned, operated, leased, or 6managed by an entity located within the State or any entity 7affiliated with an entity located within the State. These 8bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness or obligation of 9the State of Illinois and it shall be plainly stated on the 10face of each bond that it does not constitute an indebtedness 11or obligation of the State of Illinois, but is payable solely 12from the revenues, income or other assets of the Authority 13pledged therefor.14    (f) The bonding authority granted under this Section is in 15addition to and not limited by the provisions of Section 16845-5.17(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 100-919, eff. 8-17-18.) 18    (20 ILCS 3501/845-45)19    Sec. 845-45. Prohibited financial interest in contracts; 20other potential conflicts of interest. 21    (a) No member, officer, agent, or employee of the 22Authority may be in any manner financially interested, 23directly in that person's own name or indirectly in the name of 24any other person, association, trust, or corporation, in any 25contract or agreement upon which that person may be called to   HB5407- 8 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1act or vote. No member, officer, or employee of the Authority 2may represent before the Authority, either as an agent or 3otherwise, any person, association, trust, or corporation, 4with respect to any application or bid for any contract or 5agreement upon which the person may be called to act or vote. 6No member, officer, or employee of the Authority may take or 7receive, or offer to take or receive, either directly or 8indirectly, any money or other thing of value as a gift, bribe, 9or means of influencing that person's vote or action in that 10person's official capacity. Any member, officer, or employee 11of the Authority who holds a financial interest prohibited by 12this Section shall abstain from deliberating or voting on the 13award or material modification of any contract or agreement in 14which that person holds a financial interest. If an Authority 15member abstains from deliberation or voting on a matter in 16accordance with this Section, the abstaining member shall be 17considered present for the purposes of establishing or 18maintaining a quorum. An officer or employee of the Authority 19that has abstained from the deliberation and awarding of a 20contract or agreement is permitted to perform any 21non-discretionary administrative duties necessary to carry out 22the decision of the Authority with respect to the contract or 23agreement. shall, in his or her own name or in the name of a 24nominee, be an officer or director or hold an ownership 25interest of more than 7 1/2% in any person, association, 26trust, corporation, partnership, or other entity that is, in   HB5407- 9 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1its own name or in the name of a nominee, a party to a contract 2or agreement upon which the member, officer, agent, or 3employee may be called upon to act or vote.4    (b) A member, officer, or employee of the Authority shall 5not be considered to have a financial interest in a contract or 6agreement if (i) the contract or agreement under consideration 7by the Authority is with a person, firm, partnership, 8association, corporation, cooperative association, or public 9body in which the member, officer, or employee of the 10Authority has less than a 5% share in the ownership of the 11entity, (ii) the interested member, officer, or employee 12discloses the nature and extent of the financial interest 13prior to deliberations concerning the proposed award or 14material modification of the contract or agreement, (iii) the 15contract or agreement is less than $1,500, and (iv) the 16cumulative amount of all contracts or agreements so awarded to 17the same person, firm, association, partnership, corporation, 18or cooperative association in the same fiscal year does not 19exceed $25,000. The limitations on individual and cumulative 20contract or agreement amounts shall not apply to contracts or 21agreements that are awarded after a competitive sealed 22procurement or, in the case of a competitive grant 23opportunity, a merit-based review in which the interested 24member, officer, or employee was not involved. A member, 25officer, or employee of the Authority shall not be considered 26to have a financial interest in a contract or agreement   HB5407- 10 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1involving a not-for-profit corporation, a unit of local 2government, a school district, or any other public body if 3such member, officer, or employee of the Authority serves as 4an officer, director, or member of the not-for-profit 5corporation, unit of local government, school district, or 6other public body on a volunteer basis with no compensation 7except for reimbursement by for expenses incurred as the 8result of the volunteer service. With respect to any direct or 9any indirect interest, other than an interest prohibited in 10subsection (a), in a contract or agreement upon which the 11member, officer, agent, or employee may be called upon to act 12or vote, a member, officer, agent, or employee of the 13Authority shall disclose the interest to the secretary of the 14Authority before the taking of final action by the Authority 15concerning the contract or agreement and shall so disclose the 16nature and extent of the interest and his or her acquisition of 17it, and those disclosures shall be publicly acknowledged by 18the Authority and entered upon the minutes of the Authority. 19If a member, officer, agent, or employee of the Authority 20holds such an interest, then he or she shall refrain from any 21further official involvement in regard to the contract or 22agreement, from voting on any matter pertaining to the 23contract or agreement, and from communicating with other 24members of the Authority or its officers, agents, and 25employees concerning the contract or agreement. 26Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any contract or   HB5407- 11 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1agreement entered into in conformity with subsections (a) and 2this subsection (b) of this Section shall not be void or 3invalid by reason of the interest described in this 4subsection, nor shall any person so disclosing the interest 5and refraining from further official involvement as provided 6in subsections (a) and (b) of this Section this subsection be 7guilty of an offense, be removed from office, or be subject to 8any other penalty on account of that interest.9    (c) Any contract or agreement made in violation of 10paragraphs (a) or (b) of this Section shall be null and void 11and give rise to no action against the Authority.12    (d) In making determinations under this Section, to the 13extent applicable, the Authority may rely on precedent and 14Attorney General guidance involving the interpretation of 15Section 3 of the Public Officer Prohibited Activities Act. The 16Authority may, by resolution, adopt policies to interpret and 17effectuate this Section. Nothing in this Section shall be 18interpreted to supersede obligations under the State Officials 19and Employees Ethics Act, the Governmental Ethics Act, the 20Illinois Procurement Code, or the Grant Accountability and 21Transparency Act.22(Source: P.A. 93-205, eff. 1-1-04.) 23    Section 10. The Public Officer Prohibited Activities Act 24is amended by changing Section 3 as follows:   HB5407- 12 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1    (50 ILCS 105/3)  (from Ch. 102, par. 3)2    Sec. 3. Prohibited interest in contracts. 3    (a) No person holding any office, either by election or 4appointment under the laws or Constitution of this State, may 5be in any manner financially interested directly in his own 6name or indirectly in the name of any other person, 7association, trust, or corporation, in any contract or the 8performance of any work in the making or letting of which such 9officer may be called upon to act or vote. No such officer may 10represent, either as agent or otherwise, any person, 11association, trust, or corporation, with respect to any 12application or bid for any contract or work in regard to which 13such officer may be called upon to vote. Nor may any such 14officer take or receive, or offer to take or receive, either 15directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value as a 16gift or bribe or means of influencing his vote or action in his 17official character. Any contract made and procured in 18violation hereof is void. This Section shall not apply to any 19person serving on an advisory panel or commission, to the 20members and officers of the Illinois Finance Authority, to any 21director serving on a hospital district board as provided 22under subsection (a-5) of Section 13 of the Hospital District 23Law, or to any person serving as both a contractual employee 24and as a member of a public hospital board as provided under 25Article 11 of the Illinois Municipal Code in a municipality 26with a population between 13,000 and 16,000 that is located in   HB5407- 13 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1a county with a population between 50,000 and 70,000.2    (b) However, any elected or appointed member of the 3governing body may provide materials, merchandise, property, 4services, or labor, subject to the following provisions under 5either paragraph (1) or (2):6        (1) If:7            A. the contract is with a person, firm, 8        partnership, association, corporation, or cooperative 9        association in which such interested member of the 10        governing body of the municipality has less than a 7 11        1/2% share in the ownership; and12            B. such interested member publicly discloses the 13        nature and extent of his interest prior to or during 14        deliberations concerning the proposed award of the 15        contract; and16            C. such interested member abstains from voting on 17        the award of the contract, though he shall be 18        considered present for the purposes of establishing a 19        quorum; and20            D. such contract is approved by a majority vote of 21        those members presently holding office; and22            E. the contract is awarded after sealed bids to 23        the lowest responsible bidder if the amount of the 24        contract exceeds $1500, or awarded without bidding if 25        the amount of the contract is less than $1500; and26            F. the award of the contract would not cause the   HB5407- 14 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1        aggregate amount of all such contracts so awarded to 2        the same person, firm, association, partnership, 3        corporation, or cooperative association in the same 4        fiscal year to exceed $25,000.5        (2) If:6            A. the award of the contract is approved by a 7        majority vote of the governing body of the 8        municipality provided that any such interested member 9        shall abstain from voting; and10            B. the amount of the contract does not exceed 11        $2,000; and12            C. the award of the contract would not cause the 13        aggregate amount of all such contracts so awarded to 14        the same person, firm, association, partnership, 15        corporation, or cooperative association in the same 16        fiscal year to exceed $4,000; and17            D. such interested member publicly discloses the 18        nature and extent of his interest prior to or during 19        deliberations concerning the proposed award of the 20        contract; and21            E. such interested member abstains from voting on 22        the award of the contract, though he shall be 23        considered present for the purposes of establishing a 24        quorum.25    (b-5) In addition to the above exemptions, any elected or 26appointed member of the governing body may provide materials,   HB5407- 15 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1merchandise, property, services, or labor if:2        A. the contract is with a person, firm, partnership, 3    association, corporation, or cooperative association in 4    which the interested member of the governing body of the 5    municipality, advisory panel, or commission has less than 6    a 1% share in the ownership; and7        B. the award of the contract is approved by a majority 8    vote of the governing body of the municipality provided 9    that any such interested member shall abstain from voting; 10    and11        C. such interested member publicly discloses the 12    nature and extent of his interest before or during 13    deliberations concerning the proposed award of the 14    contract; and15        D. such interested member abstains from voting on the 16    award of the contract, though he shall be considered 17    present for the purposes of establishing a quorum.18    (c) A contract for the procurement of public utility 19services by a public entity with a public utility company is 20not barred by this Section by one or more members of the 21governing body of the public entity being an officer or 22employee of the public utility company or holding an ownership 23interest of no more than 7 1/2% in the public utility company, 24or holding an ownership interest of any size if the public 25entity is a municipality with a population of less than 7,500 26and the public utility's rates are approved by the Illinois   HB5407- 16 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1Commerce Commission. An elected or appointed member of the 2governing body of the public entity having such an interest 3shall be deemed not to have a prohibited interest under this 4Section.5    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section or 6any other law to the contrary, until January 1, 1994, a member 7of the city council of a municipality with a population under 820,000 may purchase real estate from the municipality, at a 9price of not less than 100% of the value of the real estate as 10determined by a written MAI certified appraisal or by a 11written certified appraisal of a State certified or licensed 12real estate appraiser, if the purchase is approved by a 13unanimous vote of the city council members then holding office 14(except for the member desiring to purchase the real estate, 15who shall not vote on the question).16    (e) For the purposes of this Section only, a municipal 17officer shall not be deemed interested if the officer is an 18employee of a company or owns or holds an interest of 1% or 19less in the municipal officer's individual name in a company, 20or both, that company is involved in the transaction of 21business with the municipality, and that company's stock is 22traded on a nationally recognized securities market, provided 23the interested member: (i) publicly discloses the fact that he 24or she is an employee or holds an interest of 1% or less in a 25company before deliberation of the proposed award of the 26contract; (ii) refrains from evaluating, recommending,   HB5407- 17 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1approving, deliberating, or otherwise participating in 2negotiation, approval, or both, of the contract, work, or 3business; (iii) abstains from voting on the award of the 4contract though he or she shall be considered present for 5purposes of establishing a quorum; and (iv) the contract is 6approved by a majority vote of those members currently holding 7office.8    A municipal officer shall not be deemed interested if the 9officer owns or holds an interest of 1% or less, not in the 10officer's individual name but through a mutual fund or 11exchange-traded fund, in a company, that company is involved 12in the transaction of business with the municipality, and that 13company's stock is traded on a nationally recognized 14securities market.15    (f) Under either of the following circumstances, a 16municipal, county, or township officer may hold a position on 17the board of a not-for-profit corporation that is interested 18in a contract, work, or business of the municipality, county, 19or township: 20        (1) If the municipal, county, or township officer is 21    appointed by the governing body of the municipality, 22    county, or township to represent the interests of the 23    municipality, county, or township on a not-for-profit 24    corporation's board, then the municipal, county, or 25    township officer may actively vote on matters involving 26    either that board or the municipality, county, or   HB5407- 18 -LRB104 20263 HLH 33714 b1    township, at any time, so long as the membership on the 2    not-for-profit board is not a paid position, except that 3    the municipal, county, or township officer may be 4    reimbursed by the not-for-profit board for expenses 5    incurred as the result of membership on the not-for-profit 6    board. 7        (2) If the municipal, county, or township officer is 8    not appointed to the governing body of a not-for-profit 9    corporation by the governing body of the municipality, 10    county, or township, then the municipal, county, or 11    township officer may continue to serve; however, the 12    municipal, county, or township officer shall abstain from 13    voting on any proposition before the municipal, county, or 14    township governing body directly involving the 15    not-for-profit corporation and, for those matters, shall 16    not be counted as present for the purposes of a quorum of 17    the municipal, county, or township governing body. 18(Source: P.A. 103-25, eff. 1-1-24.)